Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202052-1906
Recording of nonconsensual common-law
lien; claimant; serve copy upon owner; sheriff; duties; proceeding to enforce;
time limit.

In
order that the owner of real property upon which a nonconsensual common-law
lien is recorded shall have notice of the recording of the lien, the claimant
shall cause the sheriff to serve a copy of the recorded lien upon the owner
of the real property upon which the nonconsensual common-law lien is recorded
and the sheriff shall make return thereof without delay by filing proof of
service with the register of deeds as provided in subsection (1) of section
25-507.01. There shall be no filing fee for filing the proof of service. A
judicial proceeding to enforce a nonconsensual common-law lien shall be instituted
by the claimant within ten days after recording the lien. Failure to serve
a copy of the recorded lien upon the owner or failure to file a judicial proceeding
to enforce the lien shall cause the lien to lapse and be of no legal effect.

Laws 2013, LB3, § 5.